Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1007
Attachment; several orders against same defendant; time of service.

When there are several orders of attachment against the same defendant, they shall be executed in the order in which they are received by the sheriff.

R.S.1867, Code § 204, p. 426;

R.S.1913, § 7738;

C.S.1922, § 8682;

C.S.1929, § 20-1007;

R.S.1943, § 25-1007.

First levy has priority. Moore v. Fedewa, 13 Neb. 379, 14 N.W. 170 (1882).